Utah statutes.
63M-3-202.   Intellectual properties discovered or developed -- Ownership -- Patenting -- Licensing.

(1)  To the extent not inconsistent with the patent laws of the United States, the intellectual properties which are newly discovered or newly developed in the course of the design, construction, and operation of the pilot plant during the objective period:

(a)  shall be owned by the state of Utah to the same extent as the pilot plant and production from it as provided for in Subsection 63M-3-201(2)(e); and

(b)  shall, if patentable, be patented in a manner appropriate to this ownership by the state and the other owners.

(2)  Any intellectual properties described in Subsection (1) insofar as they are so owned by the state may be licensed for the objective period upon such terms as are approved by the council.

